Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 2 Residential Second Mortgages

7-4-30 through 7-4-36.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 574, §§ 2-6; Ga. L. 1967, p. 637, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1086, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1114, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 726, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1281, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 511, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1146, § 8, effective March 31, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1146, § 8 repealed and reserved this article, effective March 31, 1983.